Utah statutes.
61-2b-38.   Division to publish roster of appraisers.
The division shall prepare and issue at least once each calendar year a roster
of appraisers containing the information required by the Federal Financial
Institutions Examination Council.    The division shall transmit the roster to
the Federal Financial Institutions Examinations Council at least annually.
